California statutes. Elections Code
Any member of the precinct board, when using a language other than English at the polls, shall communicate with voters in that language only as he or she would be lawfully permitted to communicate in English under the code. The member shall be subject to like penalty for any illegal communication as if it had occurred in English.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14227.5.

(a) At a partisan primary election, before providing a voter who has declined to disclose a political party preference with a nonpartisan ballot or before the voter enters the voting booth, as applicable, a member of the precinct board shall provide a uniform notification to the voter informing him or her that he or she may request a political party’s ballot and the name of each political party that has authorized a voter who has declined to disclose a political party preference to vote in its ballot.

(b) A county elections official shall train the
 members of a precinct board regarding their duties under subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 819, Sec. 4.   (AB 837)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Challenging a Voter [14240. - 14253.]

14240.

(a) A person offering to vote may be orally challenged within the polling place only by a member of the precinct board upon any or all of the following grounds:

(1) That the voter is not the person whose name appears on the roster.

(2) That the voter is not a resident of the precinct, or in an election conducted using a voter center, not a resident of the county.

(3) That the voter is not a citizen of the United States.

(4) That the voter has voted in that election.

(b) A person, other than a member of a precinct board or other official responsible for the conduct of the election, shall not challenge or question any voter concerning the voter’s qualifications to vote.

(c) If any member of a precinct board receives, by mail or otherwise, any document or list concerning the residence or other voting qualifications of any person or persons, with the express or implied suggestion, request, or demand that the person or persons be challenged, the board member shall first determine whether the document or list contains or is accompanied by evidence constituting probable cause to justify or substantiate a challenge. In any case, before making any use whatever of such a list or document, the member of the precinct board shall immediately contact
 the elections official, charged with the duty of conducting the election, and describe the contents of the document or list and the evidence, if any, received bearing on voting qualifications. The elections official shall advise the members of the precinct board as to the sufficiency of probable cause for instituting and substantiating the challenge and as to the law as herein provided, relating to hearings and procedures for challenges by members of the precinct board and determination thereof by a precinct board. The elections official may, if necessary, designate a deputy to receive and answer inquiries from precinct board members as herein provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 320, Sec. 9.   (AB 646)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14241.

A piece of mailed matter returned undelivered by the post office shall not be accepted or used as evidence upon which to initiate a challenge as to residency by any member of the precinct board unless other evidence or testimony is also presented, nor shall the mailed matter, standing alone without other evidence or testimony, be accepted as evidence by the precinct board in determining a challenge.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14242.

The ground for challenge set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 14240 shall not apply to any person duly registered as a voter in any precinct in California and moving from that precinct within 14 days prior to an election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 811, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14243.

If the challenge is on the ground that the person seeking to vote is not the person whose name appears on the roster, a member of the precinct board shall tender the following oath: “You do swear (or affirm) that you are the person whose name is entered on the roster.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 57.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14244.

If the challenge is on the ground that the person seeking to vote is not a resident of the precinct, or in an election conducted using a voter center, not a resident of the county, the person challenged shall be sworn to answer questions, and after having been sworn, a member of the precinct board shall ask that person: “Are you a resident of this precinct?” or in an election conducted using a voter center, “Are you a resident of the county?”; If the answer to the question is “Yes,” without significant qualification, no other questions shall be asked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 58.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14245.

If the challenge is on the ground that the person challenged has already cast a ballot for this election, a member of the precinct board shall tender to the person challenged this oath:

“You do swear (or affirm) that you have not previously voted in this election, either by vote by mail ballot or at a polling place.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 508, Sec. 81.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14246.

If the challenge is on the ground either that the person challenged is not the person whose name appears on the roster, or that he or she has voted that day, the challenge shall be determined in favor of the person challenged if that person takes the oath as set forth either in Section 14243 or 14245.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 59.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14247.

Challenges of voters that they are not residents of the precinct or citizens of the United States shall be tried and determined by the precinct board at the time of the challenge. The precinct board may, at its discretion, also request any other person, present in the polling place to be sworn and answer questions, whom the board believes may have knowledge or information concerning the facts of the challenge.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14248.

Before administering an oath to a person regarding his or her place of residence, a member of the precinct board shall read to the person challenged, the rules prescribed by Section 14249 and Article 2 (commencing with Section 2020) of Chapter 1 of Division 2.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14249.

If any person challenged refuses to take the oaths tendered, or refuses to be sworn and to answer the questions concerning the matter of residence, that person shall not be allowed to vote.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14250.

The precinct board, in determining the place of residence of any person, shall be governed by the rules set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 2020) of Chapter 1 of Division 2.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14251.

Any doubt in the interpretation of the law shall be resolved in favor of the challenged voter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14252.

The precinct board shall compile a list showing all of the following:

(a) The name and address of each person challenged.

(b) The name, address, and any other identification as a voter, of each person offering information concerning any person’s qualifications to vote, or testifying pursuant to Section 14247, together with the name and address and any other identification of the person about whom the information or testimony is given.

(c) The grounds of each challenge.

(d) The determination of the board upon the challenge, together with any written evidence pertaining thereto.

(e) If evidence has been presented to the board requesting challenges, the evidence shall be returned to the elections official responsible for the conduct of the election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14253.

In the event that the precinct board determines that persistent challenging of voters is resulting in a delay of voting sufficient to cause voters to forego voting because of insufficient time or for fear of unwarranted intimidation, the board shall discontinue all challenges, and so note on the roster.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Issuing Ballots and Voting [14270. - 14300.]

14270.

The procedure at the polls where voting is conducted pursuant to this division shall be the same as at other polling places, except as provided in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14271.

After the opening of the polls, the precinct board shall not allow any voter to enter the voting booth until it ascertains that he or she is entitled to vote.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14272.

Before each voter enters the voting booth, the precinct board shall inform him or her how to operate the voting device. If a marking or punching device is used, the voter shall be instructed to use only that device. The voter shall also be instructed how to fold the ballot and place it in the envelope. If any voter, after entering the booth, asks for information regarding the operation of the machine or device, the precinct board shall give him or her the information.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14273.

The device for marking the ballot may be handed to the voter with his or her ballot before the voter goes into the voting booth, and shall be returned to the precinct board after he or she has finished marking his or her ballot.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14274.

In any election where ballots are to be counted both manually and by electromechanical tabulating devices, the marking device used for marking ballots to be counted electromechanically may be used for marking ballots to be counted manually.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14275.

Before leaving the voting booth or compartment, the voter shall fold or place the ballot card in the envelope so that the ballot markings of the voter will not be exposed, and the ballot stub will be outside of the envelope or other container, to be removed by the precinct board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14277.

The voter shall hand the folded ballot or the envelope containing the ballot to a precinct board member, who shall remove the ballot stub, hand it to the voter, and deposit the ballot in the ballot container. If the ballot is to be transferred from the envelope to the ballot container, care shall be taken not to disclose the markings of the voter on the ballot.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14278.

The precinct board shall give each voter only one ballot, as provided in Section 13102.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14279.

Unless otherwise provided by law, no person shall apply for or receive any ballot at any precinct other than that in which the voter is entitled to vote.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14280.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a voter shall not receive a ballot from any person other than one of the precinct officers. No person other than a precinct officer or officer authorized by law shall deliver a ballot to any voter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14281.

On receiving a ballot, the voter shall forthwith retire alone to one of the booths or compartments provided, and mark the ballot, unless Section 14222 or 14224 is applicable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14282.

(a) If a voter is unable to mark a paper ballot or the ballot marking device, the voter shall receive the assistance of not more than two persons selected by the voter, other than the voter’s employer, an agent of the voter’s employer, or an officer or agent of the union of which
 the voter is a member.

(b) The county elections official shall provide information on the county elections internet website and in the county voter information guide informing voters that a voter who is unable to mark a ballot may bring up to two individuals to the polls to assist them in voting as specified in subdivision (a), and that a voter with a disability may vote a regular ballot outside a polling place in accordance with subdivision (d). The information shall be available in all languages for which the county has requirements under Section 14201 of this code and Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).

(c) A person assisting a voter shall not divulge any information regarding the marking of the ballot.

(d) (1) A voter with a disability may appear outside the polling place and vote a regular ballot. The person may vote the ballot in a place that is as near as possible to the polling place and that is accessible to people with disabilities. A precinct board member shall take a regular ballot or ballot marking device to that person, qualify that person to vote, and return the voted ballot to the polling place.

(2) A precinct board member may satisfy paragraph (1) by only bringing a regular ballot outside to the voter if the county does not have the capability to bring the ballot marking device outside of the polling place.

(3) Signage shall be posted outside the polling place and adjacent to the area where the voter may appear to vote indicating that the option is available for a voter with a disability to vote there. The polling place shall establish a method for a voter with a
 disability to contact a precinct board member in order to vote outside the polling place, such as a posted phone number, doorbell device, or the stationing of a precinct board member outside the polling place.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 658, Sec. 2.   (AB 545)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14283.

The precinct officers shall keep a list of the voters who have been assisted in marking their ballots. The list of assisted voters shall be returned to the elections official and preserved with other election materials and records.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14284.

(a) All ballots shall be marked only with the marking device provided by the elections official or, for vote by mail ballots, recommended by the elections official.

(b) If a ballot cannot be tabulated because of the marking device used, it shall be processed as specified in Section 15210.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 44.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14285.

To vote in a contest where two or more candidates for the same office are to be elected, a voter shall mark the voting targets next to the names of the candidates of the voter’s choice, up to the number of candidates to be elected.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 46.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14286.

When a measure is submitted to the voters, the voter shall place a mark on the ballot in the appropriate space next to the answer the voter desires to give as to that measure. The voter, in marking the ballot, shall use the marking device provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 47.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14287.

No voter shall place personal information upon a ballot that identifies the voter. “Personal information” includes all of the following:

(a) The signature of the voter.

(b) The initials, name, or address of the voter.

(c) A voter identification number.

(d) A social security number.

(e) A driver’s license number.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 739, Sec. 2.   (SB 183)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14288.

If a voter spoils or defaces a ballot, the voter shall at once return it to the ballot clerk and receive another ballot. A voter shall not receive more than a total of three ballots, including his or her original ballot, in this manner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14290.

The precinct board shall immediately cancel, without unfolding them, all the spoiled ballots returned. The board shall write the word “spoiled” on the back of each spoiled ballot in ink or indelible pencil and return the spoiled ballots with the unused ballots.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14291.

(a) After the ballot is marked, a voter shall not show it to any person in a manner that reveals its contents, except as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) A voter may voluntarily disclose how he or she voted if that voluntary act does not violate any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 813, Sec. 2.   (AB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14292.

Before leaving the voting booth or compartment, the voter shall fold the ballot according to the instructions on it, so that the marks on its face are not visible and only the number on the ballot and the top margin are exposed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14293.

Having folded the ballot, the voter shall deliver it folded to a member of the precinct board, who shall then separate the slip containing the number from the ballot, hand the slip to the voter, and deposit the ballot in the ballot box in the presence of the voter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14294.

(a) At all elections, a member of the precinct board shall mark, in the space provided on the voter list posted at or near the polling place, the name of each person who has voted, by drawing a line through the name of the voter, with a pen or indelible pencil. The board member shall mark off the names at least once each hour, to and including 6 p.m. In all counties not using the voter list, the board member shall draw a line under the last name signed in the roster at 6 p.m. or at the time of discontinuation of this procedure, whichever occurs last.

(b) If an electronic poll book is used at the polling place, the elections official may use a
 printout or an electronic means of notification of the list of each person who has voted. The elections official shall provide the printout or electronic notification at least once each hour, to and including 6 p.m., or at the time of discontinuation of this procedure, whichever occurs last.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 60.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14295.

No voter shall deliver to any member of the precinct board any ballot other than the one received from the board member.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14296.

Any voter who does not vote the ballot he or she has received, shall, before leaving the polling place, return it to the board member having charge of the ballots, who shall immediately cancel it. All canceled ballots shall be returned to the ballot clerk in the same manner as spoiled ballots.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14297.

(a) No later than the time at which the voter delivers the voted ballot, a precinct board member in charge of the voter list shall write in the space opposite the name of the voter the line number designating the position of the name on the roster. In those counties using a combined roster, the voter’s name shall be crossed off of the voter list in lieu of numbering.

(b) In an election conducted using vote centers, or if an electronic poll book is used, only the electronic roster shall be updated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 61.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14298.

(a) The precinct board shall maintain at least one printed copy of the voter list posted during the whole time of voting. The copies of the voter list shall not be marked in any manner except by a member of the precinct board acting pursuant to Section 14294.

(b) A member of the precinct board shall post a notice on each voter list that reads as follows: “This voter list shall not be marked in any manner except by a member of the precinct board acting pursuant to Section 14294. Any person who removes, tears, marks, or otherwise defaces this voter list with the intent to falsify or prevent others from readily ascertaining the name, address, or political preference of any voter, or the fact that a voter has or has not voted, is guilty of a misdemeanor.”

(c) If an electronic poll book is used, a notice shall be posted near the electronic poll book that reads as follows: “This electronic roster shall not be operated in any manner except by a member of the precinct board acting pursuant to Section 14294. Any person who tampers with, manipulates, or otherwise operates or interacts with this device with the intent to falsify or prevent others from readily ascertaining the name, address, or political preference of any voter, or the fact that a voter has or has not voted, is guilty of a misdemeanor.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 100, Sec. 3.   (AB 1591)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14299.

(a) If a precinct board is unable to furnish a ballot to a qualified voter because there is an insufficient number of ballots at the precinct, the elections official shall deliver to the precinct additional ballots to ensure that all eligible voters can cast their ballots within two hours.

(b) While awaiting the delivery of additional ballots, the precinct board shall provide each voter with the option of casting his or her vote immediately using an alternative procedure established prior to the election or waiting for the delivery of the additional ballots.

(c) The alternative procedure required by this section shall be subject to approval by the Secretary of State. The elections official shall submit the alternative procedure to the Secretary of State for approval by a date to be determined by the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 501, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14300.

(a) In the case of an election for a state or federal office, each polling place using a direct recording electronic voting system, as defined by Section 19271, the elections official shall provide paper ballots equivalent to the following percentages:

(1) For a statewide general election, no less than 10 percent of the registered voters in the polling place.

(2) For a statewide direct primary election, for each partisan ballot form for which at least 10 percent of the registered voters in the polling place are eligible to request, no less than 5 percent of the registered voters in the precinct eligible to request that ballot form
 at the polling place. For nonpartisan voters, the total number of paper ballots among all ballot forms that they are eligible to request shall be no less than 5 percent of registered nonpartisan voters at the polling place.

(3) For any other state or federal election contest, no less than 5 percent of registered voters at the polling place.

(4) For purposes of this section, the number of registered voters shall be based on the registration on the 88th day prior to the day of the election.

(b) The elections official shall establish procedures for the use of the paper ballots described in this section in the event the direct recording electronic voting system becomes nonfunctional.

(c) Upon request, the precinct board shall provide a paper ballot to a voter, regardless of the availability of the direct recording electronic voting system, as long as supplies remain available.

(d) The paper ballots described in this section may consist of provisional ballots.

(e) Any vote cast on a provisional ballot subject to this section by an otherwise qualified voter shall be counted as a regular ballot and shall not be subject to the requirements of Section 14310.

(f) In elections conducted using voter centers, the elections official shall provide a sufficient amount of ballot stock to be used for printing ballots in each vote center.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 63.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Provisional Voting [14310. - 14314.]

14310.

(a) At all elections, a voter claiming to be properly registered, but whose qualification or entitlement to vote cannot be immediately established upon examination of the roster for the precinct or upon examination of the records on file with the county elections official, shall be entitled to vote a provisional ballot as follows:

(1) An elections official shall advise the voter of the voter’s right to cast a provisional ballot.

(2) The voter shall be provided a provisional ballot, written
 instructions regarding the process and procedures for casting the ballot, and a written affirmation regarding the voter’s registration and eligibility to vote. The written instructions shall include the information set forth in subdivisions (c) and (d).

(3) The voter shall be required to execute, in the presence of an elections official, the written affirmation stating that the voter is eligible to vote and registered in the county where the voter desires to vote.

(b) Once voted, the voter’s ballot shall be sealed in a provisional ballot envelope, and the ballot in its envelope shall be deposited in the ballot box. All provisional ballots voted shall remain sealed in their envelopes for return to the elections official in accordance with the elections official’s
 instructions. The provisional ballot envelopes specified in this subdivision shall be of a color different than the color of, but printed substantially similar to, the envelopes used for vote by mail ballots, and shall be completed in the same manner as vote by mail envelopes.

(c) (1) During the official canvass, the elections official shall examine the records with respect to all provisional ballots cast. Using the procedures that apply to the comparison of signatures on vote by mail ballots pursuant to Section 3019, the elections official shall compare the signature on each provisional ballot envelope with the signature on the voter’s affidavit of registration or other signature in the voter’s registration record. If the signatures do not compare or the provisional ballot envelope is not signed, the ballot shall be
 rejected. A variation of the signature caused by the substitution of initials for the first or middle name, or both, shall not invalidate the ballot.

(2) (A) Provisional ballots shall not be included in any semiofficial or official canvass, except under one or more of the following conditions:

(i) The elections official establishes prior to the completion of the official canvass, from the records in his or her office, the claimant’s right to vote.

(ii) The provisional ballot has been cast and included in the canvass pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 2170) of Chapter 2 of Division 2.

(iii) Upon the order of a superior court
 in the county of the voter’s residence.

(B) A voter may seek the court order specified in this paragraph regarding his or her own ballot at any time prior to completion of the official canvass. Any judicial action or appeal shall have priority over all other civil matters. A fee shall not be charged to the claimant by the clerk of the court for services rendered in an action under this section.

(3) The provisional ballot of a voter who is otherwise entitled to vote shall not be rejected because the voter did not cast his or her ballot in the precinct to which he or she was assigned by the elections official.

(A) If the ballot cast by the voter contains the same candidates and measures on which the voter would
 have been entitled to vote in his or her assigned precinct, the elections official shall count the votes for the entire ballot.

(B) If the ballot cast by the voter contains candidates or measures on which the voter would not have been entitled to vote in his or her assigned precinct, the elections official shall count only the votes for the candidates and measures on which the voter was entitled to vote in his or her assigned precinct.

(d) The Secretary of State shall establish a free access system that any voter who casts a provisional ballot may access to discover whether the voter’s provisional ballot was counted and, if not, the reason why it was not counted.

(e) The Secretary of State may adopt appropriate regulations
 for the purpose of ensuring the uniform application of this section.

(f) This section shall apply to any vote by mail voter described by Section 3015 who is unable to surrender his or her unvoted vote by mail voter’s ballot.

(g) Any existing supply of envelopes marked “special challenged ballot” may be used until the supply is exhausted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 64.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14311.

(a) A voter who has moved from one address to another within the same county and who has not reregistered to vote at that new address may, at his or her option, vote on the day of the election at the polling place at which he or she is entitled to vote based on his or her current residence address, or at the office of the county elections official or other central location designated by that elections official. The voter shall be reregistered at the place of voting for future elections.

(b) Voters casting ballots under this section shall be required to vote by provisional ballot, as provided in Section 14310.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 809, Sec. 9.5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14312.

This article shall be liberally construed in favor of the provisional voter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 175, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14313.

(a) Upon the declaration of a state of emergency by the Governor and the issuance of an executive order authorizing an emergency worker to cast a ballot outside of his or her home precinct, elections officials in the counties included in the executive order shall, upon demand, issue to an emergency worker a provisional ballot that may be identical to the provisional ballot offered to other voters in the county, using a process to be determined by the elections official. The elections official shall transmit for processing any ballot cast, including any materials necessary to process the ballot, pursuant to this section to the elections official in the county where the voter is registered to vote.

(b) To be counted, a ballot cast pursuant to this section shall satisfy both of the following requirements:

(1) Be cast by the voter no later than the close of the polls on election day.

(2) Be received by the county elections official where the voter is registered on or before the 10th day following the date of the election.

(c) Upon receipt of the returned ballot, the elections official shall process the ballot pursuant to the procedures in subdivision (c) of Section 14310.

(d) If the requirements in subdivisions (b) and (c) are met and the ballot is eligible to be counted, the ballot shall be duplicated and all other materials preserved according to the procedures set forth in this code.

(e) “Emergency worker” for the purposes of this
 section means a person who is officially engaged in responding to the proclaimed state of emergency and whose vocation has been identified in an executive order relating to the state of emergency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 395, Sec. 1.   (AB 1440)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

14314.

The Secretary of State shall promulgate regulations establishing guidelines for county elections officials relating to the processing of provisional ballots.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 821, Sec. 2.   (AB 1970)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Closing of the Polls [14400. - 14443.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [14400. - 14405.]

14400.

At any election, all members of the precinct board shall be present at the closing of the polls.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14401.

When the polls are closed, the precinct board shall proclaim that fact aloud at the place of election. After the proclamation no ballot shall be received. However, if at the hour of closing there are any other voters in the polling place, or in line at the door, who are qualified to vote and have not been able to do so since appearing, the polls shall be kept open a sufficient time to enable them to vote.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14402.

Any one who arrives at the polling place after the time provided for closing the polls shall not be entitled to vote, even though the polls are open when the voter arrives.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14402.5.

If the time for closing the polls is extended pursuant to a court order, all votes cast during the time that the closing of the polls is extended shall be by provisional ballot. Any provisional ballots cast pursuant to this section shall be separated and held apart from other provisional ballots cast by voters prior to the time the closing of the polls was extended.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 809, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14403.

(a) Immediately upon the closing of the polls and before any voted ballot is taken from any of the ballot containers, the precinct board member shall, in the presence of all persons in the room who may desire to observe them, proceed to render the unused ballots unusable in one of the following ways:

(1) By drawing across its face, in ink or indelible pencil, two lines that cross each other, the cross to be more
 than three inches square. The precinct board member shall thereupon, immediately and before any ballots are taken from any ballot container, place all defaced ballots within an envelope or other receptacle provided for that purpose.

(2) By tearing or cutting in a manner so that it is apparent that the ballot has been intentionally destroyed to prevent its use. If this method of destruction is used, it shall be done in a manner so that the serial number of the ballots is retained for the purposes of reconciliation.

(3) By placing all of the unused ballots into a special container provided for that purpose. A tamperproof seal containing spaces for entering the total number of unused ballots enclosed, the beginning and ending serial numbers thereof, and signature lines for all members of the precinct board following a statement certifying that all of the ballots were placed in the
 container in their presence and the information on the seal is true and correct, shall be provided. After signing the seal, it shall be placed on the container in a manner so that the container cannot be opened without tearing the seal.

(b) This section does not apply to elections conducted using vote centers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 65.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14404.

(a) Immediately upon the arrival of the hour when the polls are required by law to be closed on election day, the elections official conducting the election shall openly, in the elections official’s main office, in the presence of any persons who are present to observe, according to the procedure set forth in Section 14403, proceed to render every unused ballot remaining in the control of the elections official unusable. The elections official shall forthwith make and file an
 affidavit, in writing, as to the number of ballots destroyed. If the procedure in subdivision (c) of Section 14403 is used, the tamperproof seal shall be signed by the elections official and at least one deputy or assistant elections official or registrar. The sealed container shall then be placed, with the sealed containers containing unused ballots from the precincts, in a security area by the elections official until disposition is made pursuant to Section 17301 or 17302.

Alternatively, the elections official may, immediately upon the arrival of the hour when the polls are closed, recycle for any other lawful purpose any unused ballots remaining in the control of the elections official that clearly identify the election for which they were prepared. No later than 30 days following the last day to certify the official results of the election, the elections official shall make and file an affidavit, in writing, as to the number of ballots recycled. At the elections
 official’s discretion, the unused ballots may be recycled up to six months following an election or at the conclusion of an election contest proceeding, whichever is later.

(b) This section does not apply to elections conducted using vote centers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 66.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14405.

(a) The members of the precinct board shall account for the ballots delivered to them by returning a sufficient number of unused ballots to make up, when added to the number of official ballots cast and the number of spoiled and canceled ballots returned, the number of ballots given to them. The accounting of ballots may either:

(1) Take place at the polling place.

(2) Be performed by the county elections official at the central counting place.

(b) The precinct board shall complete the roster as required in Section 14107, and shall also complete and sign the certificate of performance prescribed in Section 15280, if that section applies.

(c) This section does not apply to elections conducted using vote centers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 67.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)